Nebraska, session 109, LB189.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 21 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance
Act:
(1) Base period means the first four of the last five completed
calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day of a covered
individual's benefit year;
(2) Benefit year means the one-year period beginning with the first
day of the first week with respect to which the covered individual first
files a valid claim for family and medical leave benefits, and thereafter
the one-year period beginning with the first day of the first week with
respect to which the covered individual next files a valid claim for
family and medical leave benefits after the termination of his or her
last preceding benefit year. For purposes of this subdivision, a week
with respect to which a covered individual files a valid claim shall be
deemed to be in, within, or during that benefit year which includes the
greater part of such week;
(3) Commissioner means the Commissioner of Labor;
(4) Covered active duty or call to covered active duty status has
the same meaning as in 29 C.F.R. 825.126(a)(1) and (2), as such
regulation existed on January 1, 2025;
(5) Covered employer means an employer that elects to participate in
the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act as provided in section 6
of this act;
(6) Covered individual means:
(a) An individual who: (i) Is employed by a covered employer and
(ii) elects to participate in the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance
Act as provided in section 7 of this act; or
(b) A self-employed individual who has elected to participate in the
Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act as provided in section 7 of
this act;
-2-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
(7) Covered servicemember has the same meaning as in 29 U.S.C. 2611
and the regulations issued thereunder, as such section and regulations
existed on January 1, 2025;
(8) Family and medical leave benefits means the benefits provided
under section 4 of this act for periods of paid family and medical leave;
(9) Family member means and includes:
(a) A biological, adopted, or foster child, a stepchild, or a legal
ward of a covered individual or the covered individual's spouse or a
person to whom the covered individual or the covered individual's spouse
stood in loco parentis when such person was a minor child, regardless of
the age or dependency status of such child, stepchild, legal ward, or
person;
(b) A biological, adoptive, or foster parent, a stepparent, or a
legal guardian of a covered individual or the covered individual's spouse
or a person who stood in loco parentis to the covered individual or the
covered individual's spouse when the covered individual or the covered
individual's spouse was a minor child;
(c) A covered individual's spouse; and
(d) A grandparent, grandchild, or sibling, whether of a biological,
foster, adoptive, or step relationship, of the covered individual or the
covered individual's spouse;
(10) Health care provider means any person licensed under federal or
state law to provide medical or emergency services, including, but not
limited to, doctors, nurses, emergency room personnel, and certified
nurse midwives;
(11) Individual average weekly wage means:
(a) For a covered individual who has earned wages during each
calendar quarter of the base period, the amount of wages paid to the
covered individual in the highest calendar quarter of the base period
divided by thirteen; or
(b) For a covered individual who has not earned wages during each
-3-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
calendar quarter of the base period, the covered individual's average
weekly wage during the most recently completed calendar quarter;
(12) Military member means a covered individual's family member who
is in the armed forces of the United States;
(13) Next of kin has the same meaning as in 29 U.S.C. 2611 and the
regulations issued thereunder, as such section and regulations existed on
January 1, 2025;
(14) Paid family and medical leave means leave taken by a covered
individual for a qualifying reason described in section 3 of this act for
which the covered individual is eligible for family and medical leave
benefits;
(15) Qualifying exigency leave means leave taken by a covered
individual for the following purposes if the covered individual's family
member is on covered active duty or call to covered active duty status:
(a) Any of the purposes specified in 29 C.F.R. 825.126(b)(3)(i)
through (iv), as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025;
(b) Any of the purposes specified in 29 C.F.R. 825.126(b)(8)(i)
through (iv), as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025;
(c) To address any issue that arises from the fact that the military
member is notified of an impending call or order to covered active duty
seven or fewer calendar days prior to the date of deployment. Leave taken
for this purpose can be used for a period of seven calendar days
beginning on the date the military member is notified of an impending
call or order to covered active duty;
(d) To attend any official ceremony, program, or event sponsored by
the military that is related to the covered active duty or call to
covered active duty status of the military member;
(e) To attend family support or assistance programs and
informational briefings sponsored or promoted by the military, military
service organizations, or the American Red Cross that are related to the
covered active duty or call to covered active duty status of the military
-4-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
member;
(f) To make or update financial or legal arrangements to address the
military member's absence while on covered active duty or call to covered
active duty status, such as preparing and executing financial and health
care powers of attorney, transferring bank account signature authority,
obtaining military identification cards, or preparing or updating a will
or living trust;
(g) To act as the military member's representative before a federal,
state, or local agency for the purposes of obtaining, arranging, or
appealing military service benefits while the military member is on
covered active duty or call to covered active duty status, and for a
period of ninety days following the termination of the military member's
covered active duty status;
(h) To attend counseling provided by someone other than a health
care provider for the covered individual, for the military member, for
the biological, adopted, or foster child, the stepchild, or the legal
ward of the military member, for a child of the military member's spouse,
or for a child to whom the military member stands in loco parentis, if
the need for counseling arises from the covered active duty or call to
covered active duty status of the military member;
(i) To spend time with the military member who is on short-term,
temporary, rest and recuperation leave during the period of deployment.
Leave taken for this purpose can be used for a period of fifteen calendar
days beginning on the date the military member commences each instance of
rest and recuperation leave;
(j) To attend arrival ceremonies, reintegration briefings and
events, and any other official ceremony or program sponsored by the
military during a period of ninety days following the termination of the
military member's covered active duty status;
(k) To address issues that arise from the death of the military
member while on covered active duty status, such as meeting and
-5-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
recovering the body of the military member, making funeral arrangements,
and attending funeral services; and
(l) To address other events which arise out of the military member's
covered active duty or call to covered active duty status if the covered
employer and covered individual agree that such leave qualifies as an
exigency and agree to both the timing and duration of such leave;
(16) Retaliatory personnel action means denial of any right
guaranteed under the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act,
including, but not limited to:
(a) Any of the following adverse actions taken against a covered
individual for the exercise of any right guaranteed in the act:
Discharge, suspension, demotion, reduction of hours, any other adverse
action, or any threat of any such adverse action; and
(b) Interference with, or punishment for, participating in or
assisting with an investigation, proceeding, or hearing under the act;
(17) Serious health condition has the same meaning as in 29 U.S.C.
2611 and the regulations issued thereunder, as such section and
regulations existed on January 1, 2025;
(18) State average weekly wage means the state average weekly wage
as annually determined under section 48-121.02; and
(19) Week means a period of seven consecutive days ending Saturday
at midnight.
Sec. 3. (1) Beginning January 1, 2028, a covered individual may
take paid family and medical leave for the following qualifying reasons:
(a) To care for a new child of the covered individual during the
first year after the birth, adoption, or placement through foster care of
that child;
(b) To care for a family member of the covered individual who has a
serious health condition;
(c) To care for a covered servicemember if the covered individual is
a family member or the next of kin of the covered servicemember;
-6-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
(d) For qualifying exigency leave; or
(e) Because the covered individual has a serious health condition,
including pregnancy, that makes the covered individual unable to perform
the functions of the position held by such covered individual.
(2) The maximum amount of paid family and medical leave that a
covered individual may take shall be ten weeks or, for leave taken on an
intermittent basis, sixty work days during any benefit year.
Sec. 4. (1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the family
and medical leave benefits to be paid to the covered individual for any
week of paid family and medical leave shall be:
(a) Ninety percent of the portion of the individual average weekly
wage that is at or below fifty percent of the state average weekly wage;
and
(b) Fifty percent of the portion of the individual average weekly
wage that is above fifty percent of the state average weekly wage.
(2) The amount of family and medical leave benefits to be paid to a
covered individual in any week shall not exceed sixty-six percent of the
state average weekly wage.
(3) Family and medical leave benefits are not payable for the first
week in any benefit year that a covered individual takes paid family and
medical leave. Such week shall be known as the waiting period. If the
covered individual takes ten or more days of paid family and medical
leave in such benefit year, the covered individual shall be paid for the
waiting period. The waiting period shall occur only once in any benefit
year. This subsection shall not apply to paid family and medical leave
taken for the reasons stated in subdivisions (15)(c) and (15)(i) of
section 2 of this act or for the reason stated in subdivision (1)(a) of
section 3 of this act.
(4) Family and medical leave benefits are not payable for less than
one workday of paid family and medical leave taken in any one workweek.
(5) The first payment of family and medical leave benefits must be
-7-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
made to the covered individual within three weeks after the initial claim
is filed under section 5 of this act, and subsequent payments of such
benefits must be made every week thereafter for as long as the covered
individual is eligible. Family and medical leave benefits shall be paid
in the manner prescribed by the commissioner, which may include
electronic payments.
(6) For purposes of the calculations required under this section,
only wages earned in employment as defined in section 48-604 shall be
considered.
(7) A covered individual shall not receive family and medical leave
benefits at the same time that he or she is receiving workers'
compensation benefits for total disability or benefits under the
Employment Security Law.
Sec. 5. (1) To receive family and medical leave benefits, a covered
individual shall file an initial claim for such benefits with the
commissioner on a form prescribed by the commissioner. The claim shall
include:
(a) The name and address of the covered individual;
(b) The reason for taking the paid family and medical leave;
(c) A schedule showing the dates during which the covered individual
intends to take paid family and medical leave, to the extent such dates
are known;
(d) Such wage information as the commissioner may require to
determine the amount of family and medical leave benefits;
(e) Such documentation as the commissioner may require from a health
care provider for proof of a serious health condition;
(f) The name and address of each covered employer that employs the
covered individual; and
(g) Such other information as required by the commissioner to
calculate and determine eligibility for family and medical leave
benefits.
-8-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
(2) After an initial claim is filed, the commissioner shall send
notice of the filing of such claim to each covered employer that employs
the covered individual and shall include with such notice the schedule of
leave submitted under subdivision (1)(c) of this section. The
commissioner shall then determine the covered individual's eligibility
for family and medical leave benefits. If the commissioner determines
that the covered individual is eligible, the commissioner shall begin to
pay family and medical leave benefits to the covered individual pursuant
to section 4 of this act. If the commissioner determines that the covered
individual is ineligible, the commissioner shall notify the covered
individual of the commissioner's determination. Such determination of
ineligibility may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act.
(3) Information relating to the covered individual's use of paid
family and medical leave may be shared with any covered employer that
employs the covered individual upon the covered employer's request in a
manner prescribed by the commissioner.
(4) The commissioner shall notify a covered individual when such
covered individual's paid family and medical leave is set to terminate.
Such notification shall be sent in a manner prescribed by the
commissioner. The notification must be received by the covered individual
one week in advance of the day when such paid family and medical leave is
set to expire.
Sec. 6. (1) An employer may elect to participate in the Paid Family
and Medical Leave Insurance Act by applying to the commissioner in a form
and manner prescribed by the commissioner.
(2) An employer who elects to participate in the act may terminate
such participation by applying to the commission in a form and manner
prescribed by the commissioner. Any termination shall not be effective
until at least three months following acceptance of such application.
Sec. 7. (1) A covered individual may elect to participate in the
-9-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act by applying to the
commissioner in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner.
(2) A covered individual who elects to participate in the act may
terminate such participation by applying to the commission in a form and
manner prescribed by the commissioner.
Sec. 8. (1) The Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund is
created. The fund shall be administered by the commissioner and shall
consist of private donations, money transferred to the fund by the
Legislature, contributions from covered individuals, and donations from
covered employers. Any money in the fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) Beginning on an implementation date selected by the commissioner
that is on or before January 1, 2027, covered individuals shall begin
making contributions to pay for participation in the Paid Family and
Medical Leave Insurance Act. Contributions shall become due and be paid
in such manner and at such times as the commissioner shall prescribe by
rule and regulation. The commissioner shall remit the contributions to
the State Treasurer for credit to the Paid Family and Medical Leave
Insurance Fund. Such contributions shall be used to pay family and
medical leave benefits payable under the Paid Family and Medical Leave
Insurance Act and the administrative costs incurred in administering the
act.
(3) The commissioner shall be responsible for evaluating and
determining on an annual basis the contribution amounts necessary to
finance the total amount of family and medical leave benefits payable
under the act. If at any time during the year the commissioner determines
that the contribution amounts are not sufficient to pay the family and
medical leave benefits payable under the act, the commissioner shall
increase the contribution amounts by the lowest amount necessary to pay
all such benefits.
-10-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
(4) Beginning on the effective date of this act, the commissioner
shall accept donations from any private individual or entity, including
any employer, and shall remit all donations received to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund.
Such private donations shall be used to pay the upfront administrative
costs and ongoing administrative costs related to the Paid Family and
Medical Leave Insurance Act. On October 1, 2026, the State Treasurer
shall transfer five million five hundred fifty-eight thousand dollars
from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund to the Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance Fund. Such transferred amount shall also be used to pay
the upfront administrative costs related to the act. The transferred
amount shall be repaid to the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund when the
commissioner determines that the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance
Fund will have sufficient funds to pay all required family and medical
leave benefits after such repayment is made, but in no case shall such
repayment be made later than October 1, 2030. The commissioner shall
notify the State Treasurer when to make such repayment, and the State
Treasurer shall then transfer five million five hundred fifty-eight
thousand dollars from the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund to
the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund.
Sec. 9. (1) A covered individual may take paid family and medical
leave on an intermittent basis if:
(a) The intermittent leave is for the covered individual's own
serious health condition;
(b) The intermittent leave is to care for a family member with a
serious health condition; or
(c) The intermittent leave is to care for a newborn or a newly
placed adopted or foster care child of the covered individual and the
covered individual has received the covered employer's written approval
for such intermittent leave.
(2) A covered individual in need of intermittent leave to care for a
-11-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
family member with a foreseeable serious health condition shall work with
his or her covered employer to schedule the leave so as not to unduly
disrupt the operations of the covered employer. In such cases, the
covered employer may transfer the covered individual temporarily to an
alternative job with equivalent pay and benefits that accommodates
recurring periods of leave better than the covered individual's regular
job. When the need for intermittent leave is unforeseeable, the covered
individual shall provide notice as soon as possible and practicable under
the circumstances.
(3) The minimum amount of intermittent leave that may be taken at
any one time is one workday.
(4) Family and medical leave benefits for intermittent leave shall
be prorated.
(5) Taking intermittent leave under this section shall not result in
a reduction of the total amount of leave to which a covered individual is
entitled beyond the amount of leave actually taken.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to entitle a covered
individual to more paid family and medical leave than the individual is
otherwise entitled to under the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance
Act.
Sec. 10. (1) Any covered individual who takes paid family and
medical leave under the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act is
entitled, on return from the leave:
(a) To be restored by the covered employer to the position of
employment held by the covered individual when the leave commenced; or
(b) To be restored by the covered employer to an equivalent position
with equivalent employment benefits, pay, and other terms and conditions
of employment.
(2) During any paid family and medical leave taken, the covered
employer shall maintain any health benefits the covered individual had
prior to taking such leave for the duration of the leave as if the
-12-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
covered individual had continued in employment continuously from the date
he or she commenced the leave until the date the family and medical leave
benefits terminate if the covered individual continues to pay the covered
individual's share of the cost of such health benefits as required prior
to the commencement of the leave.
(3) The taking of paid family and medical leave under the act shall
not result in the loss of any employment benefits accrued before the date
on which the leave commenced.
(4) A covered employer shall not require a covered individual to
exhaust his or her accrued vacation or sick time prior to taking paid
family and medical leave.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to entitle any
covered individual to any right, benefit, or position of employment other
than any right, benefit, or position to which the covered individual
would have been entitled had he or she not taken the paid family and
medical leave.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a covered
employer from requiring a covered individual on paid family and medical
leave to report periodically to the covered employer on the status of the
covered individual and his or her intention to return to work.
(7) A covered individual who fraudulently obtains family and medical
leave benefits shall not be entitled to any of the protections provided
in this section.
Sec. 11. (1) It shall be unlawful for a covered employer to
interfere with, restrain, or deny the exercise of, or the attempt to
exercise, any right protected under the Paid Family and Medical Leave
Insurance Act or to take a retaliatory personnel action against a covered
individual because the individual exercised rights protected under the
act. Such rights include, but are not limited to:
(a) The right to request or use paid family and medical leave;
(b) The right to communicate to the covered employer an intent to
-13-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
file a claim for family and medical leave benefits;
(c) The right to appeal eligibility determinations;
(d) The right to testify or participate in any investigation,
hearing, or proceeding under the act; and
(e) The right to inform the commissioner of any alleged violation of
the act.
(2) It shall be unlawful for a covered employer's absence control
policy to count paid family and medical leave taken under the act as an
absence that may lead to, or result in, discipline, discharge, demotion,
suspension, or any other adverse action.
Sec. 12. (1) A covered individual who is entitled to leave under
the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, 29 U.S.C. 2601 et seq.,
shall take any paid family and medical leave allowed under the Paid
Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act concurrently with leave taken
pursuant to the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993.
(2) A covered individual who is entitled to any kind of disability
or family care leave under a collective-bargaining agreement or employer
policy shall take any paid family and medical leave allowed under the
Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act concurrently with such
disability or family care leave if the different types of leave are being
granted for the same reason.
(3) Nothing in the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act shall
prohibit covered employers from providing leave benefits that are in
addition to the family and medical leave benefits required under the act.
Such additional leave benefits shall not be considered when calculating
family and medical leave benefits under section 4 of this act.
(4) The Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act does not
diminish a covered employer's obligation to comply with any of the
following that provide more generous leave:
(a) A collective-bargaining agreement;
(b) An employer policy; or
-14-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
(c) Any state or federal law.
(5) A covered individual's right to paid family and medical leave
under the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act shall not be
diminished by a collective-bargaining agreement entered into or renewed,
or an employer policy adopted or retained, after the effective date of
this act.
Sec. 13. (1) Each covered employer shall provide written notice
regarding the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act to each covered
individual upon hiring and annually thereafter. A covered employer shall
also provide written notice to a covered individual when he or she
requests paid family and medical leave under the act or when the covered
employer acquires knowledge that a covered individual's leave may qualify
for family and medical leave benefits. Such notice shall include:
(a) An explanation of the covered individual's right to paid family
and medical leave and the terms under which it may be used;
(b) The amount of family and medical leave benefits;
(c) The procedure for filing a claim for family and medical leave
benefits;
(d) An explanation of the employee protections provided under
section 10 of this act;
(e) A statement explaining that retaliatory personnel actions
against a covered individual for requesting or using paid family and
medical leave are prohibited; and
(f) A statement explaining that the covered individual has a right
to file a complaint for violations of the Paid Family and Medical Leave
Insurance Act.
(2) A covered employer shall also display and maintain a poster in a
conspicuous place accessible to covered individuals at the covered
employer's place of business that contains the information required under
subsection (1) of this section.
Sec. 14. (1) Claims filed and appeals taken pursuant to the Paid
-15-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act and all related information shall
be confidential and shall not be a public record, except that:
(a) Information relating to a covered individual's use of paid
family and medical leave may be disclosed as described in subsection (3)
of section 5 of this act;
(b) Information may be disclosed to a public official for use in the
performance of his or her official duties. For purposes of this
subdivision, performance of official duties means the administration or
enforcement of law or the execution of the official responsibilities of a
federal, state, or local elected official. Administration of law includes
research related to the law administered by the public official.
Execution of official responsibilities does not include solicitation of
contributions or expenditures to, or on behalf of, a candidate for public
office or to a political party;
(c) Information may be disclosed in response to a court order or
subpoena; and
(d) Information about a particular covered individual or covered
employer may be disclosed to:
(i) Such covered individual or covered employer upon the
individual's or employer's written request;
(ii) One who acts as an agent for the covered individual or covered
employer if the agent presents a written release from the covered
individual or covered employer, where practicable, or other evidence of
authority to act on behalf of the covered individual or covered employer;
(iii) An elected official who is performing constituent services if
the official presents reasonable evidence that the covered individual or
covered employer has authorized such disclosure; or
(iv) An attorney who presents written evidence that the attorney is
representing the covered individual or covered employer in a matter
arising under the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act.
(2) Any person who receives information under this section and
-16-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
rediscloses such information for any purpose other than the purpose for
which it was originally obtained shall be guilty of a Class III
misdemeanor.
Sec. 15. (1) A covered individual is disqualified from receiving
family and medical leave benefits for one year if the individual is
determined by the commissioner to have willfully made a false statement
or misrepresentation regarding a material fact, or willfully failed to
report a material fact, to obtain family and medical leave benefits. The
one-year period of disqualification shall begin on the date of the
commissioner's determination.
(2) If family and medical leave benefits are paid erroneously or as
a result of willful misrepresentation, or if a claim for family and
medical leave benefits is rejected after benefits are paid, the
commissioner may seek repayment of such benefits from the recipient by:
(a) Bringing a civil action in the name of the commissioner;
(b) Offsetting such payment against any future family and medical
leave benefits payable to the covered individual with respect to the
benefit year current at the time of such receipt or any benefit year
which may commence within three years after the end of such current
benefit year; or
(c) Issuing a levy on salary, wages, or other regular payments due
to or received by the covered individual as provided in subsection (3) of
this section.
(3)(a) Notice of a levy issued under subdivision (2)(c) of this
section shall be mailed to the covered individual at his or her last-
known address not later than the date that the levy is served.
(b) Such levy shall be continuous from the date the levy is served
until the amount of the levy is satisfied.
(c) Exemptions or limitations on the amount of salary, wages, or
other regular payment that can be garnished or levied upon by a judgment
creditor shall apply to such levy.
-17-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
(d) Any person upon whom a levy is served who fails or refuses to
honor the levy without cause may be held liable for the amount of the
levy up to the value of the assets of the covered individual liable to
repay the overpayment that are under the control of the person upon whom
the levy is served at the time of service and thereafter.
Sec. 16. It is the intent of the Legislature that the commissioner
utilize state data and technology that is used for other state programs,
including, but not limited to, unemployment insurance, to the maximum
extent possible for purposes of carrying out the commissioner's
responsibilities under the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act.
Sec. 17. (1) If the Internal Revenue Service determines that family
and medical leave benefits are subject to federal income tax, the
commissioner shall advise any covered individual filing a claim for
family and medical leave benefits, at the time of filing such claim,
that:
(a) The Internal Revenue Service has determined that family and
medical leave benefits are subject to federal income tax;
(b) Requirements exist pertaining to estimated tax payments;
(c) The covered individual may elect to have federal income tax
deducted and withheld from the covered individual's family and medical
leave benefits; and
(d) The covered individual is permitted to change a previously
elected income withholding status.
(2) If the covered individual elects to have federal tax payments
withheld, the commissioner shall deduct and withhold the amount specified
in the Internal Revenue Code in a manner consistent with state and
federal law. Amounts deducted and withheld must remain in the Paid Family
and Medical Leave Insurance Fund until transferred to the federal taxing
authority as a payment of income tax.
Sec. 18. (1) The commissioner may conduct investigations in order
to determine whether there has been compliance with the Paid Family and
-18-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
Medical Leave Insurance Act. Investigations shall take place at such
times and places as the commissioner directs. Investigations shall be
conducted so as not to unduly disrupt the operations of covered
employers.
(2) For purposes of any investigation under this section, the
commissioner may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses,
compel attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any
books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents
or records which the commissioner deems relevant or material to the
inquiry.
(3) In case of contumacy by, or refusal to, obey a subpoena issued
to a person, a court of competent jurisdiction, upon application by the
commissioner, may issue to such person an order requiring the person to
appear before the commissioner and produce documentary evidence if so
ordered or give evidence relating to the matter under investigation or in
question. Any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by
the court as a contempt.
(4) The commissioner shall issue a citation to a covered employer
when an investigation reveals that the covered employer has violated the
act. When a citation is issued, the commissioner shall notify the covered
employer of the proposed administrative penalty, if any, by certified
mail or any other manner of delivery by which the United States Postal
Service can verify delivery. The administrative penalty shall be not more
than five hundred dollars in the case of a first violation and not more
than five thousand dollars in the case of a second or subsequent
violation. The covered employer shall have fifteen working days from the
date of the citation to contest it. Notice of contest shall be sent to
the commissioner who shall provide a hearing pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. 19. On or before December 31, 2028, and on or before December
31 of each year thereafter, the commissioner shall electronically submit
-19-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
a report to the Legislature. The report shall include:
(1) The amount and percentage of family and medical leave benefits
paid for each type of paid family and medical leave described in
subsection (1) of section 3 of this act;
(2) The percentage of family and medical leave benefits paid to each
gender for each type of paid family and medical leave described in
subsection (1) of section 3 of this act;
(3) The amount of contributions remitted by covered individuals
pursuant to section 8 of this act;
(4) The median payment level for family and medical leave benefits;
(5) The occupation and industry of covered individuals receiving
family and medical leave benefits;
(6) The balance of the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund;
(7) A summary of the outreach efforts made by the commissioner and
by covered employers to increase awareness of the availability of paid
family and medical leave; and
(8) The types of family members for whom paid family and medical
leave as described in subdivision (1)(b) of section 3 of this act was
taken.
Sec. 20. Family and medical leave benefits shall not be considered
compensation under the County Employees Retirement Act, the Judges
Retirement Act, the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act, the School
Employees Retirement Act, the State Employees Retirement Act, or any
other retirement plan administered by the Public Employees Retirement
Board and shall not be eligible for deferral under any deferred
compensation plan administered by the Public Employees Retirement Board.
Sec. 21. The commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations as necessary to carry out the Paid Family and Medical Leave
Insurance Act.
Sec. 22. Section 48-652, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
-20-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
48-652 (1)(a) A separate experience account shall be established for
each employer who is liable for payment of combined tax. Whenever and
wherever in the Employment Security Law the terms reserve account or
experience account are used, unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, such terms shall be deemed interchangeable and synonymous and
reference to either of such accounts shall refer to and also include the
other.
(b) A separate reimbursement account shall be established for each
employer who is liable for payments in lieu of contributions. All
benefits paid with respect to service in employment for such employer
shall be charged to his or her reimbursement account, and such employer
shall be billed for and shall be liable for the payment of the amount
charged when billed by the commissioner. Payments in lieu of
contributions received by the commissioner on behalf of each such
employer shall be credited to such employer's reimbursement account, and
two or more employers who are liable for payments in lieu of
contributions may jointly apply to the commissioner for establishment of
a group account for the purpose of sharing the cost of benefits paid that
are attributable to service in the employ of such employers. The
commissioner shall adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as he
or she deems necessary with respect to applications for establishment,
maintenance, and termination of group accounts authorized by this
subdivision.
(2) All contributions paid by an employer shall be credited to the
experience account of such employer. State unemployment insurance tax
payments shall not be credited to the experience account of each
employer. Partial payments of combined tax shall be credited so that at
least eighty percent of the combined tax payment excluding interest and
penalty is credited first to contributions due. Contributions with
respect to prior years which are received on or before January 31 of any
year shall be considered as having been paid at the beginning of the
-21-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
calendar year. All voluntary contributions which are received on or
before February 28 of any year shall be considered as having been paid at
the beginning of the calendar year.
(3)(a) Each experience account shall be charged only for benefits
based upon wages paid by such employer. No benefits shall be charged to
the experience account of any employer if:
(i) Such benefits were paid on the basis of a period of employment
from which the claimant (A) left work voluntarily without good cause, (B)
left work voluntarily due to a nonwork-connected illness or injury, (C)
left work voluntarily with good cause to escape abuse as defined in
section 42-903 between household members as provided in subdivision (1)
of section 48-628.13, (D) left work from which he or she was discharged
for misconduct connected with his or her work, (E) left work voluntarily
and is entitled to unemployment benefits without disqualification in
accordance with subdivision (3), (5), or (11) of section 48-628.13, or
(F) was involuntarily separated from employment and such benefits were
paid pursuant to section 48-628.17; and
(ii) The employer has filed timely notice of the facts on which such
exemption is claimed in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated by the commissioner.
(b) No benefits shall be charged to the experience account of any
employer if such benefits were paid during a week when the individual was
participating in training approved under section 236(a)(1) of the federal
Trade Act of 1974, 19 U.S.C. 2296(a)(1).
(c) No benefits shall be charged to the experience account of any
employer if such benefits were paid to an individual who:
(i) Worked for an employer for twenty weeks or less to temporarily
replace a permanent employee receiving family and medical leave benefits
under the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act and who was laid
off due to the return of such permanent employee;
(ii) Was discharged due to his or her failure to return to work
-22-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
after the expiration of paid family and medical leave taken pursuant to
the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act; or
(iii) Left work voluntarily while on paid family and medical leave
taken pursuant to the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act.
(d) (c) Each reimbursement account shall be charged only for
benefits paid that were based upon wages paid by such employer in the
base period that were wages for insured work solely by reason of section
48-627.01.
(e) (d) Benefits paid to an eligible individual shall be charged
against the account of his or her most recent employers within his or her
base period against whose accounts the maximum charges hereunder have not
previously been made in the inverse chronological order in which the
employment of such individual occurred. The maximum amount so charged
against the account of any employer, other than an employer for which
services in employment as provided in subdivision (4)(a) of section
48-604 are performed, shall not exceed the total benefit amount to which
such individual was entitled as set out in section 48-626 with respect to
base period wages of such individual paid by such employer plus one-half
the amount of extended benefits paid to such eligible individual with
respect to base period wages of such individual paid by such employer.
The commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
determining the manner in which benefits shall be charged against the
account of several employers for whom an individual performed employment
during the same quarter or during the same base period.
(4)(a) An employer's experience account shall be terminated one
calendar year after such employer has ceased to be subject to the
Employment Security Law, except that if the commissioner finds that an
employer's business is closed solely because one or more of the owners,
officers, partners, or limited liability company members or the majority
stockholder entered the armed forces of the United States, or of any of
its allies, such employer's account shall not be terminated and, if the
-23-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
business is resumed within two years after the discharge or release from
active duty in the armed forces of such person or persons, the employer's
experience account shall be deemed to have been continuous throughout
such period.
(b) An experience account terminated pursuant to this subsection
shall be reinstated if:
(i) The employer becomes subject again to the Employment Security
Law within one calendar year after termination of such experience
account;
(ii) The employer makes a written application for reinstatement of
such experience account to the commissioner within two calendar years
after termination of such experience account; and
(iii) The commissioner finds that the employer is operating
substantially the same business as prior to the termination of such
experience account.
(5) All money in the Unemployment Compensation Fund shall be kept
mingled and undivided. In no case shall the payment of benefits to an
individual be denied or withheld because the experience account of any
employer does not have a total of contributions paid in excess of
benefits charged to such experience account.
(6)(a) For benefit years beginning before September 3, 2017, if an
individual's base period wage credits represent part-time employment for
a contributory employer and the contributory employer continues to employ
the individual to the same extent as during the base period, then the
contributory employer's experience account shall not be charged if the
contributory employer has filed timely notice of the facts on which such
exemption is claimed in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated by the commissioner.
(b) For benefit years beginning on or after September 3, 2017, if an
individual's base period wage credits represent part-time employment for
an employer and the employer continues to employ the individual to the
-24-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
same extent as during the base period, then the employer's experience
account, in the case of a contributory employer, or the employer's
reimbursement account, in the case of a reimbursable employer, shall not
be charged if the employer has filed timely notice of the facts on which
such exemption is claimed in accordance with rules and regulations
prescribed by the commissioner.
(7) If a contributory employer responds to the department's request
for information within the time period set forth in subsection (1) of
section 48-632 and provides accurate information as known to the employer
at the time of the response, the employer's experience account shall not
be charged if the individual's separation from employment is voluntary
and without good cause as determined under section 48-628.12.
Sec. 23. Section 71-7611, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-7611 (1) The Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund is created. The State
Treasurer shall transfer (a) sixty million three hundred thousand dollars
on or before July 15, 2014, (b) sixty million three hundred fifty
thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2015, (c) sixty million three
hundred fifty thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2016, (d) sixty
million seven hundred thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2017, (e)
five hundred thousand dollars on or before May 15, 2018, (f) sixty-one
million six hundred thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2018, (g)
sixty-two million dollars on or before July 15, 2019, (h) sixty-one
million four hundred fifty thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2020,
(i) sixty-six million two hundred thousand dollars on or before July 15,
2022, (j) fifty-six million seven hundred thousand dollars on or before
July 15, 2023, (k) fifty-four million dollars on or before July 15, 2024,
and (l) fifty-four million one hundred fifty thousand dollars on or
before every July 15 thereafter from the Nebraska Medicaid
Intergovernmental Trust Fund and the Nebraska Tobacco Settlement Trust
Fund to the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund, except that such amount shall
-25-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
be reduced by the amount of the unobligated balance in the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund at the time the transfer is made. The state
investment officer shall advise the State Treasurer on the amounts to be
transferred first from the Nebraska Medicaid Intergovernmental Trust Fund
until the fund balance is depleted and from the Nebraska Tobacco
Settlement Trust Fund thereafter in order to sustain such transfers in
perpetuity. The state investment officer shall report electronically to
the Legislature on or before October 1 of every even-numbered year on the
sustainability of such transfers. The Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund
shall also include money received pursuant to section 77-2602. Except as
otherwise provided by law, no more than the amounts specified in this
subsection may be appropriated or transferred from the Nebraska Health
Care Cash Fund in any fiscal year.
The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the
Nebraska Medicaid Intergovernmental Trust Fund to the General Fund on
June 28, 2018, and June 28, 2019.
Except for the transfer authorized in section 8 of this act and as
otherwise provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this section, it is the
intent of the Legislature that no additional programs are funded through
the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund until funding for all programs with an
appropriation from the fund during FY2012-13 are restored to their
FY2012-13 levels.
(2) Any money in the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
(3) The University of Nebraska and postsecondary educational
institutions having colleges of medicine in Nebraska and their affiliated
research hospitals in Nebraska, as a condition of receiving any funds
appropriated or transferred from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund,
shall not discriminate against any person on the basis of sexual
-26-

LB189 LB189
2025 2025
orientation.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that the cost of the staff
and operating costs necessary to carry out the changes made by Laws 2018,
LB439, and not covered by fees or federal funds shall be funded from the
Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for fiscal years 2018-19 and 2019-20.
(5) It is the intent of the Legislature to fund the grants to be
awarded pursuant to section 75-1101 with the Nebraska Health Care Cash
Fund for FY2019-20 and FY2020-21.
(6) The State Treasurer shall transfer fifteen million dollars from
the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2022, but before
June 30, 2023, to the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska for
the University of Nebraska Medical Center for pancreatic cancer research
at the University of Nebraska Medical Center. Transfers from the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund in this subsection shall be contingent upon receipt
of any matching funds from private or other sources, up to fifteen
million dollars, certified by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services. Upon receipt of
any matching funds certified by the budget administrator, the State
Treasurer shall transfer an equal amount of funds to the Board of Regents
of the University of Nebraska.
Sec. 24. Original sections 48-652 and 71-7611, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-27-